Hawaii statutes.
§46-24 Limitation on salary of first deputy
or assistant. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the salary of
any first deputy or first assistant to the head of any department of the county
governments shall not exceed a sum equal to ninety-five per cent of the salary
of such department head. [L 1957, c 170, §4; am L 1959, c 255, §10a; am imp L
1965, c 223, pt of §5; Supp, §5-20; HRS §46-24]

Attorney General Opinions

Discussed. Att. Gen. Op. 63-47.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next